zh-CN: 模型火箭发动机安装座尺寸: 13 毫米（迷你）; 18 毫米（标准）; 24 毫米（中等功率）; 29 毫米（大功率）; 38 毫米; 54 毫米; 6 毫米（微型）; 其他
nl: Modelraketmotor montage maat: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standaard); 24 mm (mid-power); 29 mm (high-power); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Overig
it: Dimensione del supporto motore per razzomodellismo: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (media potenza); 29 mm (alta potenza); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Altro
nb: Størrelse på motorfeste for modellrakett: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (middels kraft); 29 mm (høy kraft); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Annet
de: Größe der Modellraketen-Motorhalterung: 13 mm (Mini); 18 mm (Standard); 24 mm (Mid-Power); 29 mm (High-Power); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (Micro); Sonstige
tr: Model roket motor yuvası çapı: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standart); 24 mm (orta güç); 29 mm (yüksek güç); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Diğer
fr: Taille du support moteur de fusée miniature: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (moyenne puissance); 29 mm (haute puissance); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Autre
vi: Kích thước giá đỡ động cơ tên lửa mô hình: 13 mm (cỡ mini); 18 mm (cỡ tiêu chuẩn); 24 mm (công suất trung bình); 29 mm (công suất cao); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (cỡ micro); Khác
hr-HR: Veličina nosača modela raketnog motora: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standardno); 24 mm (srednja snaga); 29 mm (velika snaga); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Ostalo
sl-SI: Velikost nosilca motorja modelne rakete: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standardno); 24 mm (srednja moč); 29 mm (visoka moč); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Drugo
ro-RO: Dimensiunea suportului pentru motorul rachetei de modelism: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (putere medie); 29 mm (putere mare); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Altele
hu: Modellrakéta motorfelfogatásának mérete: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (közepes teljesítmény); 29 mm (nagy teljesítmény); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Egyéb
sv: Storlek på modellraketmotorfäste: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (mid-power); 29 mm (high-power); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Annan
el: Μέγεθος βάσης κινητήρα μοντέλου πυραύλου: 13 mm (μίνι); 18 mm (τυπικό); 24 mm (μεσαίας ισχύος); 29 mm (υψηλής ισχύος); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (μικρό); Άλλο
sk-SK: Veľkosť úchytu motora modelárskej rakety: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (štandard); 24 mm (stredný výkon); 29 mm (vysoký výkon); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Iné
en: Model rocket motor mount size: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (mid-power); 29 mm (high-power); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Other
pt-BR: Foguete de modelismo tamanho do suporte do motor: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (padrão); 24 mm (potência média); 29 mm (alta potência); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Outro
cs: Velikost úchytu motoru modelové rakety: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (střední výkon); 29 mm (vysoký výkon); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Jiné
pl: Rozmiar mocowania silnika rakiety modelarskiej: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (średniej mocy); 29 mm (dużej mocy); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Inny
ja: モデルロケットモーターマウントサイズ: 13 mm (ミニ); 18 mm (標準); 24 mm (中出力); 29 mm (高出力); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (マイクロ); その他
es: Tamaño del soporte del motor del cohete de modelismo: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (estándar); 24 mm (potencia media); 29 mm (alta potencia); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Otro
lt-LT: Modelinės raketos variklio laikiklio dydis: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standartinis); 24 mm (vidutinės galios); 29 mm (didelės galios); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Kita
bg-BG: Размер на монтажа за мотор на моделна ракета: 13 мм (мини); 18 мм (стандартен); 24 мм (средна мощност); 29 мм (висока мощност); 38 мм; 54 мм; 6 мм (микро); Друго
ru: Размер крепления двигателя модели ракеты: 13 мм (мини); 18 мм (стандартный); 24 мм (средней мощности); 29 мм (высокой мощности); 38 мм; 54 мм; 6 мм (микро); Другое
pt-PT: tamanho do suporte do motor de foguete modelo: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (padrão); 24 mm (potência média); 29 mm (alta potência); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (micro); Outro
fi: Rakettimoottorin kiinnikkeen koko: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (vakio); 24 mm (keskiteho); 29 mm (suurteho); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Muu
ko: 모형 로켓 모터 마운트 크기: 13mm(미니); 18mm(표준); 24mm(미드 파워); 29mm(하이 파워); 38mm; 54mm; 6mm(마이크로); 기타
th: ขนาดฐานยึดมอเตอร์จรวดจำลอง: 13 มม. (ขนาดเล็ก); 18 มม. (มาตรฐาน); 24 มม. (กำลังปานกลาง); 29 มม. (กำลังสูง); 38 มม.; 54 มม.; 6 มม. (ไมโคร); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 模型火箭引擎安裝座尺寸: 13 mm (迷你); 18 mm (標準); 24 mm (中等功率); 29 mm (高功率); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (微型); 其他
da: Ophængsstørrelse for modelraketmotor: 13 mm (mini); 18 mm (standard); 24 mm (mellemstor kraft); 29 mm (stor kraft); 38 mm; 54 mm; 6 mm (mikro); Andet